Utah statutes.
30-1-35.   Persons performing counseling services designated by board -- Exemption from license requirements.

For the purposes of this chapter the premarital counseling board of each county or combination of counties may determine those persons who are to perform any services under this chapter and any person so acting is not subject to prosecution or other sanctions for the person's failure to hold any license for these services as may be required by the laws of the state.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

